North Dakota statutes. TITLE 60 Warehousing and Deposits
CHAPTER 60-02 Grain and Seed Warehouses

60-02-01.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the agriculture commissioner.

“Credit-sale contract” means a written contract for the sale of grain pursuant to which the sale price is to be paid or may be paid more than thirty days after the delivery or release of the grain for sale and which contains the notice provided in section 60-02-19.1. If a part of the sale price of a contract for the sale of grain is to be paid or may be paid more than thirty days after the delivery or release of the grain for sale, only such part of the contract is a credit-sale contract.

“Deferred-payment contract” means a credit-sale contract for which the amount owed for the sale of grain has been established, but the payment is postponed until a later date.

“Grain” means wheat, durum, oats, rye, barley, buckwheat, flaxseed, speltz, safflower, sunflower seeds, tame mustard, peas, beans, soybeans, corn, clover, millet, alfalfa, and any other commercially grown grain or grass seed. “Grain” as defined in this chapter shall not include grain or grass seeds owned by or in the possession of the warehouseman which have been cleaned, processed, and specifically identified for an intended use of planting for reproduction and for which a warehouse receipt has not been issued.

“Noncredit-sale contract” means a contract for the sale of grain other than a credit-sale contract.

“Public warehouse” means any elevator, mill, warehouse, subterminal, grain warehouse, terminal warehouse, or other structure in which grain is received for storing, buying, selling, shipping, or processing for compensation. Provided, however, that nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require a processor to receive, store, or purchase any lot or kind of grain at said facility.

“Public warehouseman” means the person operating a public warehouse that is located or doing business within this state, whether or not such owner or operator resides within this state. The term does not include a person that is permitted to sell seed under chapter 4.1-53, if that person does not store grain for the public and buys grain only for processing and subsequent resale as seed, or an authorized dealer or agent of a seed company holding a permit in accordance with section 4.1-53-38.

“Receipts” means grain warehouse receipts, scale tickets, checks, or other memoranda given by a public warehouseman for, or as evidence of, the receipt, storage, or sale of grain except when such memoranda was received as a result of a credit-sale contract.

“Receiving station” means any facility other than an individually licensed warehouse that is used by a licensed public warehouseman to receive and temporarily store grain prior to transferring the grain to the warehouseman’s primary licensed warehouse location or delivering it directly to market.

Source:

S.L. 1891, ch. 126, § 4; R.C. 1895, § 1786; S.L. 1899, ch. 126, § 1; R.C. 1899, § 1786; S.L. 1901, ch. 140, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 2244; C.L. 1913, § 3107; S.L. 1925, ch. 217, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 3125d1; S.L. 1927, ch. 155, §§ 2, 7, 9, 25; 1929, ch. 137, § 2; 1933, ch. 4, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 60-0201; S.L. 1963, ch. 413, § 1; 1983, ch. 672, § 1; 1985, ch. 661, § 1; 1993, ch. 52, § 3; 1993, ch. 585, § 1; 1999, ch. 533, § 1; 1999, ch. 534, § 1; 2011, ch. 69, § 9; 2019, ch. 34, § 14, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 487, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

60-02-02.
Commissioner — Powers and duties.

The commissioner has the powers and duties enumerated under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1891, ch. 126, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 1783; R.C. 1899, § 1783; R.C. 1905, § 2241; C.L. 1913, § 3100; S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 60-0202; 2019, ch. 34, § 15, effective July 1, 2019.

60-02-03.
Duties and powers of the commissioner.

The commissioner has the following powers and duties:

Exercise general supervision of the public warehouses of this state, including the handling, weighing, and storing of grain, and the management of public warehouses.

Investigate all complaints of fraud and injustice, unfair practices, and unfair discrimination.

Examine and inspect, during ordinary business hours, any licensed warehouse, including all books, documents, and records.

Require the filing of reports pertaining to the operation of the warehouse.

Make all proper rules for carrying out and enforcing any law in this state regarding public warehouses.

Source:

S.L. 1891, ch. 126, § 2; R.C. 1895, § 1784; R.C. 1899, § 1784; R.C. 1905, § 2242; S.L. 1909, ch. 230, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 3101; S.L. 1925, ch. 217, § 2; 1925 Supp., § 3125d2; S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 3; 1929, ch. 137, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 60-0203; S.L. 1983, ch. 672, § 2; 2019, ch. 34, § 16, effective July 1, 2019.

60-02-04.
Federal licensed inspector.

The commissioner may employ a federal licensed inspector whose duties are enumerated under this chapter and may employ other employees as necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 60-0204; 2019, ch. 34, § 17, effective July 1, 2019.

60-02-05.
Grain marketing — Procedure for resolving disputes.

If any dispute or disagreement arises between the person receiving and the person delivering grain at any public warehouse in this state as to the proper grade, dockage, vomitoxin level, moisture content, or protein content of any grain, an average sample of at least three pints of the grain in dispute may be taken together by both parties interested. The sample must be certified by each party as a true and representative sample of the grain in dispute on the day the grain was delivered. The sample must be forwarded in a suitable container by parcel post or express, prepaid with the name and address of both parties for inspection by a federal licensed inspector, or a mutually agreed-upon third party, who will examine the grain and adjudge what grade, dockage, vomitoxin level, moisture content, or protein content the sample of grain is entitled to under the inspection rules and grades adopted by the secretary of agriculture of the United States. The person requesting the inspection service shall pay for the inspection. If the grain in question is damp, otherwise out of condition, or if moisture content is in dispute, the sample must be placed in an airtight container. Payment for the grain involved in the dispute must be made and accepted on the basis of the determination made by the federal licensed inspector or third party. However, all other quality factors may also be considered in determining the price of the grain. An appeal of the determination made by a third party other than a federal licensed inspector may be made to a federal licensed inspector. An appeal of the determination made by a federal licensed inspector may be made as provided under the United States Grain Standards Act [Pub. L. 103-354; 108 Stat. 3237; 7 U.S.C. 79(c) and (d)] and under 7 CFR 800.125-800.140. A person not abiding by a final determination is liable for damage resulting from not abiding by the determination.

If any dispute or disagreement arises between the person delivering grain and the person receiving grain as to the determination of quality factors of grain purchased or delivered in the state for which inspection rules and grades have not been adopted by the secretary of agriculture of the United States, an average sample of at least three pints of the grain in dispute may be taken together by the parties interested. The sample must be certified by each party as a true and representative sample of the grain in dispute on the day the grain was delivered. If the grain is damp or otherwise out of condition, the sample must be placed in an airtight container. The sample must be forwarded in a suitable container by parcel post or express, prepaid with the name and address of both parties, for inspection by a federal licensed inspector, or a mutually agreed-upon third party, who may examine the grain and determine the quality factors in dispute. The person requesting the inspection service shall pay for the inspection. The determination made by the inspector, or the third party, must be used in the settlement of the dispute.

Source:

S.L. 1909, ch. 135, §§ 1, 2; C.L. 1913, §§ 3103, 3104; S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 60-0205; S.L. 1987, ch. 735, § 1; 1989, ch. 740, § 1; 1999, ch. 533, § 2.

60-02-05.1.
Notice of procedures for resolving disputes over grain.

A public warehouse shall post a notice containing the procedures specified in section 60-02-05 for resolving disputes. The commissioner shall prescribe the form of the notice and shall provide a copy of the notice to each public warehouse. The public warehouseman shall post the notice in the grain inspection room of the warehouse. The notice must specifically mention the procedure for resolving disputes applies to the grade, dockage, moisture content, and protein content of grain and to the quality factors of grain for which inspection rules and grades have not been adopted by the secretary of agriculture of the United States.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 740, § 2; 2019, ch. 34, § 18, effective July 1, 2019.

60-02-06.
Printing and publishing rules. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 672, § 25.

60-02-06.1.
Release of records — Confidentiality.

As a condition of licensure under section 60-02-07, an applicant shall agree to provide to the commissioner, upon request, any financial record the commissioner deems relevant for purposes related to:

The issuance or renewal of a public warehouse license; or

An investigation after issuance or renewal of a public warehouse license.

As a condition of licensure, an applicant shall file a records release with the commissioner, authorizing the commissioner to obtain from any source any financial record the commissioner deems relevant for purposes related to:

The issuance or renewal of a public warehouse license; or

An investigation after issuance or renewal of a public warehouse license.

Any information obtained by the commissioner under this section is confidential and may be provided only:

To federal authorities in accordance with federal law;

To the attorney general, state agencies, and law enforcement agencies, for use in the pursuit of official duties; and

As directed by an order of a court pursuant to a showing of good cause.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 34, § 34, effective July 1, 2019.

60-02-06.2.
Public warehouse license — Financial criteria to be met.

To be eligible to receive an annual license under section 60-02-07, an applicant shall submit current financial documentation to the commissioner verifying the applicant has satisfactory net worth and working capital, as determined by the commissioner.

A licensed public warehouseman or an applicant for initial licensure shall report balance sheets and income statements to the commissioner annually at the time of application for initial licensure or license renewal if the applicant purchased up to ten million dollars worth of grain during the previous licensing period, or intends to purchase up to ten million dollars worth of grain during the first year of operation.

As a condition of licensure under section 60-02-07, an applicant shall provide to the commissioner, upon request, any financial record or bank verification release the commissioner deems relevant for the purpose of verifying the financial information of an applicant pursuant to the requirements of this section.

As a condition of licensure under section 60-02-07, a new applicant must:

Pass a criminal background check;

Have a satisfactory credit score, as determined by the commissioner; and

Be a responsible person with a good business reputation, as determined by the commissioner, who:

Is in the public warehouse business;

Has knowledge of, and experience with, generally accepted grain warehousing and handling practices;

Is competent and willing to operate a public warehouse in accordance with state and federal regulations; and

Has not committed fraud or a criminal offense indicating a lack of business integrity or honesty that undermines the person’s responsibility as a warehouse operator.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 487, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

60-02-07.
Public warehouse license — Fee.

A license must be obtained from the commissioner for each public warehouse in operation in this state.

All licenses issued under this section must be for a period of one year and terminate on the thirty-first day of July in the year of expiration.

An initial annual license application that becomes effective on or after June first does not expire until July thirty-first of the following calendar year.

A license may not describe more than one public warehouse nor grant permission to operate any public warehouse other than the one described.

The annual license fee for a public warehouse is:

Four hundred dollars for a warehouse that purchased up to one million dollars worth of grain during the previous licensing period, or intends to purchase up to one million dollars worth of grain during the first year of operation;

Eight hundred dollars for a warehouse that purchased more than one million dollars worth of grain but not more than ten million dollars worth of grain during the previous licensing period, or intends to purchase more than one million dollars worth of grain but not more than ten million dollars worth of grain during the first year of operation; and

One thousand two hundred dollars for a warehouse that purchased more than ten million dollars worth of grain during the previous licensing period, or intends to purchase more than ten million dollars worth of grain during the first year of operation.

An application for an annual license renewal that is received after July fifteenth must include an additional one hundred dollar fee per warehouse.

If a public warehouseman operates two or more warehouses in the same city or siding, in conjunction with each other and with the same working force, and keeps one set of books and records for all such warehouses, and issues one series of scale tickets, warehouse receipts, checks, and credit-sale contracts for the grain stored and purchased therein, only one license is required for the operation of all such warehouses. When two or more warehouses are operated under one license, the license fee is based upon the combined value of the grain purchased by the warehouses during the previous licensing period.

Source:

S.L. 1895, ch. 115, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 1787; R.C. 1899, § 1787; R.C. 1905, § 2245; S.L. 1907, ch. 112, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 3108; S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 8; 1931, ch. 224, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 60-0207; S.L. 1963, ch. 414, § 1; 1981, ch. 624, § 1; 1983, ch. 672, § 3; 1985, ch. 661, § 2; 1987, ch. 70, § 17; 1989, ch. 741, § 1; 1993, ch. 586, § 1; 1997, ch. 8, § 3; 1999, ch. 533, § 3; 2001, ch. 557, § 1; 2003, ch. 547, § 1; 2015, ch. 469, § 1, effective March 13, 2015; 2019, ch. 34, § 19, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 487, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

60-02-07.1.
Warehouseman to operate warehouse owned by another.

A warehouseman may operate under its warehouse license a warehouse owned by another person. Storage performed for such person in the entire licensed warehouse is excepted from the storage rate and discrimination provisions contained in sections 60-02-17 and 60-02-20 to the extent of the person’s owned capacity in the warehouse.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 671, § 1.

60-02-07.2.
Receiving stations.

A licensed public warehouseman may establish a receiving station without a separate warehouse license for that facility if all of the following conditions are met:

The station is colocated with another licensed public warehouse, the operator of which will take delivery of the grain on behalf of the warehouseman who established the receiving station.

The storage space used by the receiving station is used solely by the receiving station and is not licensed as part of the warehouse that is located at that site.

The grain taken in by the receiving station is not commingled with other grain at that site.

The warehouseman establishing the station requests and receives permission from the commissioner to increase licensed capacity to include the space to be used at the receiving station.

Grain received at the receiving station is recorded on scale tickets issued by the warehouseman who established the station and is covered by that warehouseman’s bond.

Warehouse-receipted grain received at the receiving station is available for redelivery to the receiptholder at that location even if the station has been closed. A charge for redelivery must be stated in the warehouseman’s redelivery policy.

The storage space used by a receiving station need not be physically disconnected from the facilities of the other licensed warehouse located at that site.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 585, § 2; 2019, ch. 34, § 20, effective July 1, 2019.

60-02-08.
Licensing track buyer — Fee — Regulations. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 672, § 25.

60-02-09.
Bond filed by public warehouseman.

Before any license is effective for any public warehouseman under this chapter, the applicant for the license shall file a bond with the commissioner which must:

Be in a sum not less than one hundred thousand dollars for any one warehouse.

Be continuous, unless the corporate surety by certified mail notifies the licensee and the commissioner the surety bond will be canceled ninety days after receipt of the notice of cancellation.

Run to the state of North Dakota for the benefit of all persons storing or selling grain in that warehouse.

Be conditioned:

For the faithful performance of the licensee’s duties as a public warehouseman.

For compliance with the provisions of law and the rules of the commissioner relating to the storage and purchase of grain by such warehouseman.

Specify the location of each public warehouse intended to be covered by such bond.

Be for the specific purpose of:

Protecting the holders of outstanding receipts.

Covering the costs incurred by the commissioner in the administration of chapter 60-04 in the event of the licensee’s insolvency.

Not accrue to the benefit of any person entering into a credit-sale contract with a public warehouseman.

The aggregate liability of the surety under a bond does not accumulate for each successive annual license renewal period during which the bond is in force but, for losses during any annual license renewal period, is limited in the aggregate to the bond amount stated or changed by appropriate endorsement or rider.

The commissioner shall set the amount of the bond and may require an increase in the amount of any bond as the commissioner deems necessary to accomplish the purposes of this section. The amount of the bond must be:

Based on the dollar value of the grain purchased; and

Calculated using the value of the amount of grain intended to be purchased by a new licensee during the first year of operation, or the three-year rolling annual average of the value of grain purchased at the time of license renewal.

The surety on the bond must be a corporate surety company, approved by the commissioner, and authorized to do business within the state. The commissioner may accept cash, a negotiable instrument, or a bond executed by personal sureties in lieu of a surety bond if, in the commissioner’s judgment, the cash, negotiable instrument, or personal surety bond properly will protect the holders of outstanding receipts. One bond only may be given for any line of elevators, mills, or warehouses, owned, controlled, or operated by one individual, firm, corporation, or limited liability company, and the bond must be construed to cover the elevators, mills, or warehouses, as a whole and not a specific amount for each.

Source:

S.L. 1891, ch. 126, § 5; R.C. 1895, § 1789; R.C. 1899, § 1789; R.C. 1905, § 2247; S.L. 1911, ch. 251, § 1; 1913, ch. 236, § 6; C.L. 1913, § 3111; S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 10; 1933, ch. 4, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 60-0209; S.L. 1971, ch. 583, § 1; 1981, ch. 625, § 1; 1983, ch. 672, § 4; 1985, ch. 661, § 3; 1987, ch. 736, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2017, ch. 417, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 34, § 21, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 487, § 4, effective July 1, 2021.

60-02-09.1.
Bond cancellation — Release of surety.

The surety on a bond is released from all future liability accruing on the bond after the expiration of ninety days from the date of receipt by the commissioner of notice of cancellation by the surety or on a later date specified by the surety. This provision does not operate to relieve, release, or discharge the surety from any liability already accrued or which accrues before the expiration of the ninety-day period. Unless the warehouseman files a new bond at least thirty days before liability ceases, the commissioner, without hearing, shall immediately suspend the warehouseman’s license and the suspension may not be removed until a new bond has been filed and approved by the commissioner. If a license is so suspended, the warehouseman shall give notice of such suspension to each receiptholder having grain stored in the warehouse. The warehouseman shall further notify each receiptholder having grain stored in the warehouse that the grain must be removed from the warehouse or the grain will be priced and redeemed in cash in accordance with section 60-02-41.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 672, § 5; 1985, ch. 661, § 4; 1989, ch. 741, § 2; 2019, ch. 34, § 22, effective July 1, 2019.

60-02-10.
Warehouse license to be posted.

The license obtained by a public warehouseman shall be posted in a conspicuous place in the public warehouse.

Source:

S.L. 1895, ch. 115, § 2; R.C. 1895, § 1788; R.C. 1899, § 1788; R.C. 1905, § 2246; C.L. 1913, § 3109; S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 11; R.C. 1943, § 60-0210; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 625; 1983, ch. 672, § 6.

60-02-10.1.
Revocation and suspension.

The commissioner may suspend or revoke the license of any warehouseman for cause upon notice and hearing. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the license of a warehouseman must automatically be suspended for failure at any time to have or to maintain either a bond or insurance policy in the amount and type required. During a suspension of a license the warehouseman may, upon the commissioner’s approval, operate the warehouse and purchase or redeliver grain previously received, but may not receive additional grain for purchase, storage, shipping, or processing. Grain may be sold only with the prior approval of the commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 672, § 7; 1985, ch. 317, § 81; 1985, ch. 661, § 5; 2003, ch. 547, § 2; 2019, ch. 34, § 23, effective July 1, 2019.

60-02-11.
Scale ticket — Contents — Conversion.

Every public warehouseman, upon receiving grain into the warehouse, shall issue a uniform scale ticket for each load of grain received. The scale tickets must be numbered consecutively, and one copy of each ticket must be retained and remain as a permanent record. The original ticket must be delivered to the person from which the grain is received, upon receipt of each load of grain.

All scale tickets must be converted into cash, noncredit-sale contracts, credit-sale contracts, or warehouse receipts, within thirty days after the grain is delivered to the warehouse.

Nothing in this chapter requires a warehouseman to receive grain for storage. A warehouseman shall publish and post, in a conspicuous place in the warehouse, a publication identifying whether storage will be available to patrons or whether grain will be accepted via cash or a credit-sale contract arrangement.

A producer that fails to convert a scale ticket in accordance with subdivision b of subsection 1 forfeits any trust fund or credit-sale contract indemnity fund protection provided under sections 60-02-09, 60-02-19.1, and 60-04-03.1, and chapter 60-10.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 126, § 6; R.C. 1895, § 1790; R.C. 1899, § 1790; R.C. 1905, § 2248; C.L. 1913, § 3112; S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 12; R.C. 1943, § 60-0211; S.L. 1971, ch. 584, § 1; 1983, ch. 672, § 8; 1985, ch. 661, § 6; 1989, ch. 741, § 3; 2005, ch. 587, § 1; 2015, ch. 470, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 34, § 24, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 487, § 5, effective July 1, 2021.

60-02-12.
Violations of chapter — Criminal penalty — Civil penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter, if punishment is not specifically provided for, is:

Guilty of an infraction; and

Subject to a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars for each violation.

The civil penalty may be adjudicated by a court or by the agriculture commissioner through an administrative hearing .

Source:

S.L. 1891, ch. 126, § 12; R.C. 1895, § 1795; R.C. 1899, § 1795; R.C. 1905, § 2253; C.L. 1913, § 3117; S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 13; R.C. 1943, § 60-0212; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 626; 1983, ch. 672, § 9; 2021, ch. 487, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

60-02-13.
Purchase by warehouseman — Form of receipt.

There may be printed on each warehouse receipt issued by a warehouseman a receipt executed by the owner for use in case the grain represented thereby is purchased by the warehouseman. The warehouseman shall record the purchase, as to the amount paid per bushel, on the stub record or copy of its warehouse receipt books. The receipt must be in substantially the following form:

Received from , dollars and cents net, in full payment for the grain represented by this warehouse receipt. Gross price per bushel , storage per bushel , net price per bushel . I certify that I am the owner of the grain for which this receipt was issued, and that there are no liens, chattel mortgages, or other claims against the grain represented by this receipt. Dated , . Signed Owner.

Click to view

Nothing in this section contained may be construed to affect in any manner the conditions of the storage contract specified in sections 60-02-17 and 60-02-18.

Source:

S.L. 1891, ch. 126, § 7; R.C. 1895, § 1791; R.C. 1899, § 1791; S.L. 1905, ch. 110, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 2249; C.L. 1913, § 3113; S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 19; R.C. 1943, § 60-0213; S.L. 1983, ch. 672, § 10; 1999, ch. 51, § 37.

60-02-14.
Warehouse receipts — Copy.

Provision must be made for a stub record or copy of each warehouse receipt issued by a warehouseman, showing:

The serial number and date of receipt.

The kind and grade of grain.

The dockage and net weight of the grain.

The record or copy must remain in the possession of the warehouseman for inspection by the commissioner and persons properly interested.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 22; R.C. 1943, § 60-0214; S.L. 1983, ch. 672, § 11; 2019, ch. 34, § 25, effective July 1, 2019.

60-02-15.
Warehouse receipts issued by public terminal elevators. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 672, § 25.

60-02-16.
Warehouse receipt — Contents and provisions.

A warehouse receipt shall:

Be issued only upon the actual delivery of grain to the warehouse for storage.

Contain the following provisions:

The place and date when the grain was received;

The name and address of the owner of the grain;

The kind and grade of the grain according to the official standards established by the secretary of agriculture of the United States, except that receipts issued for dry edible beans must reference, in lieu of a grade designation, the number of the scale tickets containing a description of the beans, including the percentage of foreign material, splits, check seed coats, total pick, and moisture; and

The gross weight, dockage, and net weight of the grain according to North Dakota standard weight.

Be numbered consecutively and no two receipts bearing the same number and series shall be issued during the same year.

Not be altered by any warehouseman by the insertion in such receipt of any language limiting or modifying its liability as imposed by the laws of this state.

Contain, either on its face or reverse side, the warehouse and storage contract provided for in section 60-02-17.

Have printed upon it the following words: “All storage contracts on grain in store at public grain warehouses terminate on _________ , as identified in the publication required by section 60-02-17. If storage charges and warehouseman’s advances remain unpaid at the time of termination, the warehouseman may sell a sufficient amount of grain to pay the charges and advances. The receiptholder shall surrender the receipt to the issuing warehouseman for settlement.”

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 18; 1931, ch. 227, § 1; 1931, ch. 228, § 3; 1933, ch. 5, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 60-0216; S.L. 1977, ch. 565, § 1; 1983, ch. 672, § 12; 1991, ch. 696, § 1; 2005, ch. 587, § 2.

60-02-17.
Warehouse and storage contract — Storage rates — Terminal delivery.

A warehouse receipt must contain, either on its face or reverse side, the following warehouse and storage contract:

A warehouseman shall publish and post, in a conspicuous place in its warehouse, the fees that will be assessed for receiving, storing, processing, or redelivering grain and the termination date of its warehouse receipts. This publication must be filed with the commissioner as a part of the warehouse license process or annual renewal. The fees and termination date must be stated on the warehouse receipt issued for the grain. The fees or termination date may be changed upon filing a revised publication with the commissioner.

This grain is received, insured, and stored subject to the laws and rules of the state of North Dakota, the terms of this contract, and the charges and conditions stated herein and as filed with the North Dakota agriculture commissioner. Upon surrender of this receipt and payment or tender of all applicable charges, the amount, kind, and grade of grain identified in this receipt will be delivered to the person named above or the person’s order as rapidly as due diligence, care, and prudence will permit. At the option of the holder of this receipt, the amount, kind, and grade of grain for which this receipt is issued, upon demand, must be delivered back to the holder at any terminal point customarily shipped to, or at the place where received, upon the payment of any charges for receiving, handling, storage, and insurance and in case of terminal delivery, the payment in addition to the above of the regular freight charges on the gross amount called for by this ticket or in lieu thereof, a receipt issued by a bonded warehouse or elevator company doing business at the terminal point. This receipt does not require the delivery of the identical grain specified herein, but an equal amount of grain of the same kind and grade must be delivered.

Source:

S.L. 1891, ch. 126, § 11; R.C. 1895, § 1794; R.C. 1899, § 1794; R.C. 1905, § 2252; C.L. 1913, § 3116; S.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 1; 1925, ch. 216, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 3116; S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 18; 1931, ch. 227, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 60-0217; S.L. 1951, ch. 334, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 60-0217; S.L. 1961, ch. 374, § 1; 1973, ch. 496, § 1; 1975, ch. 566, § 1; 1977, ch. 565, § 2; 1979, ch. 631, § 1; 1981, ch. 624, § 2; 1991, ch. 696, § 2; 1991, ch. 697, § 1; 1999, ch. 533, § 4; 2005, ch. 587, § 3; 2017, ch. 417, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 34, § 26, effective July 1, 2019.

60-02-17.1.
Warehouse charges for grain owned by the United States. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 533, § 9.

60-02-18.
Covenant against liens may be inserted in warehouse receipt.

A public warehouseman also may insert in the warehouse receipt the following provision:

If any of the grain embraced in this receipt shall prove to be covered by a chattel mortgage or other lien, or the partial or absolute title shall prove to be in someone other than the person to whom this receipt was issued, the same, if discovered before the delivery of the grain, shall be sufficient reason for the refusal to deliver to the holder of the receipt, or if discovered after the delivery of the grain, such delivery shall be deemed an overdelivery for which said holder of this receipt, to whom such delivery is made, shall be accountable.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 18; 1931, ch. 227, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 60-0218.

Cross-References.

Lien of warehouseman, see N.D.C.C. §§ 41-07-15, 41-07-16.

60-02-19.
Warehouse receipts issued for grain in special bin. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 672, § 25.

60-02-19.1.
Credit-sale contracts.

A warehouseman may not purchase grain by a credit-sale contract except as provided in this section. All credit-sale contracts must be in writing and must be consecutively numbered at the time of printing the contract. The warehouseman shall maintain an accurate record of all credit-sale contract numbers, including the disposition of each numbered form, whether by execution, destruction, or otherwise. Each credit-sale contract must contain or provide for all of the following:

The seller’s name and address.

The conditions of delivery.

The amount and kind of grain delivered.

The price per unit or basis of value.

The date payment is to be made.

The duration of the credit-sale contract.

Notice in a clear and prominent manner that the sale is not protected by the bond coverage provided for in section 60-02-09. However, if the warehouseman has obtained bond coverage in addition to that required by section 60-02-09 and such coverage extends to the benefit of credit-sale contracts, the warehouseman may state the same in the credit-sale contract along with the extent of such coverage.

The contract must be signed by both parties and executed in duplicate. An electronic signature satisfies the requirement. An unsigned contract must be considered an unconverted scale ticket in accordance with section 60-02-11. One copy shall be retained by the warehouseman and one copy shall be delivered to the seller. Upon revocation, termination, or cancellation of a warehouseman’s license, the payment date for all credit-sale contracts shall, at the seller’s option, be advanced to a date not later than thirty days after the effective date of the revocation, termination, or cancellation, and the purchase price for all unpriced grain shall be determined as of the effective date of revocation, termination, or cancellation in accordance with all other provisions of the contract. When a public warehouse is transferred under this chapter, credit-sale contracts may be assigned to another licensed public warehouseman.

A warehouseman that uses deferred-payment contracts shall offer bond protection to producers.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 672, § 13; 1985, ch. 661, § 7; 2009, ch. 590, § 1; 2021, ch. 487, § 7, effective July 1, 2021.

60-02-20.
Discrimination by public warehouseman prohibited — Posting prices.

No public warehouseman shall discriminate:

In the buying, selling, receiving, and handling of grain or in the charges made or the service rendered to owners of stored grain;

In the receiving of grain offered for sale or storage;

In regard to the persons offering such grain for sale or storage; nor

Between points or stations except as the marketing factors or transportation costs or grain quality premiums may warrant.

No public warehouseman shall be required to receive for storage any grain which is heating or otherwise out of condition. Storing grain free of charge is prohibited except as prescribed by law. A warehouseman shall post grain prices paid in a conspicuous place in the office or driveway of the warehouseman’s place of business.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 24; 1933, ch. 4, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 60-0220.

60-02-21.
Issuance of informal memoranda forbidden — Penalty.

A warehouseman who fails to issue a receipt, as is provided in sections 60-02-13 and 60-02-14, or who issues slips, memoranda, or any other form of receipt embracing a different warehouse or storage contract than is provided for specifically in this chapter, shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 20; R.C. 1943, § 60-0221; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 627.

60-02-22.
Liability of warehouseman.

A public warehouseman is liable to the owner for the delivery of the kind, grade, quality, and quantity of grain called for by the warehouse receipt. Unless otherwise agreed, the value of any difference in kind, grade, quality, and quantity must be settled at the price on the local market on the day the warehouseman receives written request for delivery. The warehouseman may withhold from delivery a sufficient quantity of grain, based upon the local market price, to satisfy the value of any difference in kind, grade, or quality.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 25; R.C. 1943, § 60-0222; S.L. 1989, ch. 741, § 4.

60-02-23.
Records to be kept by public warehouseman.

Every public warehouseman shall keep a record of all grain received, stored, and shipped, stating the:

Weight.

Grade.

Dockage for dirt or other causes.

Name of owner.

Price paid.

Storage charge collected.

Any warehouseman whose principal office or headquarters is located outside the state of North Dakota shall make available, if requested, all books, documents, and records relevant to the North Dakota warehouse for inspection during ordinary business hours at any of its warehouses located in the state of North Dakota or other mutually acceptable place.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 21; R.C. 1943, § 60-0223; S.L. 1985, ch. 661, § 8.

60-02-24.
Reports to be made by public warehouseman — Penalty for failure.

Each licensed and bonded public warehouseman shall:

Prepare for each month a report giving facts and information called for on the form of report prepared by the commissioner. The report must contain or be verified by a written declaration the report is made under the penalties of perjury. The report may be called for more frequently if the commissioner deems necessary. Information pertaining to the volume of grain handled is a confidential trade secret and is not a public record. The commissioner may make the information available for use by other governmental entities, but the commissioner may not release the information in a manner that jeopardizes the confidentiality of individual licensees.

File the report with the commissioner not later than the last day of the following month, and failure to file this report promptly will be considered cause for revoking the warehouse license after due notice and hearing.

Keep a separate account of the grain business, if the warehouseman is engaged in handling or selling any other commodity, and under no circumstances may the grain account and other accounts be mixed.

Submit additional information requested by the commissioner pursuant to a report or an inspection within five business days.

The commissioner may refuse to renew a license to any public warehouseman that fails to make a required report.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 111, §§ 1 to 3; C.L. 1913, §§ 3135 to 3137; S.L. 1927, ch. 155, § 23; R.C. 1943, § 60-0224; S.L. 1951, ch. 335, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 60-0224; S.L. 1965, ch. 444, § 1; 1983, ch. 672, § 14; 1999, ch. 533, § 5; 2005, ch. 587, § 4; 2019, ch. 34, § 27, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 487, § 8, effective July 1, 2021.